Kentucky statutes. TITLE X Elections
Definitions

120.005.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

A “ballot” or “official ballot” means the official presentation of offices and candidates to be voted for, including write-in candidates, and all public questions submitted for determination and shall include a voting machine ballot, a paper ballot, an absentee ballot, a special ballot, a federal provisional ballot, a federal provisional absentee ballot, or a supplemental paper ballot which has been authorized for the use of the voters in any primary or regular or special election by the Secretary of State or the county clerk;

“Ballot box” means any box, bag, or other container that can be locked, sealed, or otherwise rendered tamper-resistant, for receiving ballots;

“Voting equipment” means any physical component of a voting system and includes voting machines where voting machines are in operation;

“Voting machine” or “machine” means a part of a voting system that is either:

A direct recording electronic voting machine that:

Records votes by means of a ballot display provided with mechanical or electro-operated components that may be actuated by the voter;

Processes the data by means of a computer program;

Records voting data and ballot images in internal and external memory components; and

Produces a tabulation of the voting data stored in a removable memory component and on a printed copy; or

One (1) or more electronic devices that operate independently or as a combination of a ballot-marking device and an electronic or automatic vote tabulating device; and

“Voting system” means:

The total combination of physical, mechanical, electromechanical, or electronic equipment, including the software, hardware, firmware, and documentation required to program, control, and support that equipment, that is used to:

Define ballots;

Cast and count votes;

Report or display election results; and

Maintain and produce any audit trail information; and

The practices and associated documentation used to:

Identify system components and versions of those components;

Test the system during its development and maintenance;

Maintain record records of system errors and defects;

Determine specific system changes to be made to a system after the initial qualification of the system; and

Make available any materials to the voter, such as notices, instructions, forms, or paper ballots.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 360, § 12, effective July 15, 1982; 2020 ch. 89, § 31, effective July 15, 2020; 2021 ch. 197, § 65, effective June 29, 2021.

120.010.
Time
of election of presidential electors. [Repealed.]